Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Fair Employment Practices
45-19-39.
Appeal to superior court of final order of special master or complaint dismissed by administrator.

Any party to a hearing before a special master or a complainant whose complaint has been dismissed by the administrator may appeal any adverse final order of a special master by filing a petition for review in the superior court in the county in which the alleged unlawful practice occurred or in the superior court of the residence of the respondent within 30 days of the issuance of the final order. Neither the administrator nor the special master shall be a named party; however, the administrator must be served with a copy of the petition for review. Within 30 days after the petition is served on the administrator, the administrator shall forward to the court a certified copy of the record of the hearing before the special master, including the transcript of the hearing before the special master and all evidence, administrative pleadings, and orders, or the entire record if no hearing has been held. For good cause shown, the court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record. All appeals for judicial review shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”; provided, however, that if any provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50 conflict with any provision of this article, this article controls. An individual employed by the administrator pursuant to paragraph (3) of Code Section 45-19-27 shall not have the authority to represent the complainant in any appeal to superior court of a final order of the special master or in any proceeding in any court, except to secure judicial enforcement of preliminary procedural orders of a special master.

The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the special master as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm a final order of the special master or remand the case for further proceedings. The court may reverse or modify the final order if substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because the administrative findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the agency;

Made upon unlawful procedures;

Affected by other error of law;

Not supported by substantial evidence, which shall mean that the record does not contain such relevant evidence as a reasonable mind might accept as adequate to support said findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions; or

Arbitrary, capricious, or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

If, upon judicial review of any order of a special master or in a proceeding in which a complainant seeks enforcement of a conciliation agreement, the court rules in favor of the complainant, then the court may in its discretion render an award of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of litigation in the superior court to the complainant.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 17; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

45-19-40.
Entry of court judgment based upon final order of administrator or special master; notification of parties; effect of judgment.

Any person affected by a final order of the administrator or a special master may file in the superior court of the county of the residence of the respondent a certified copy of a final order of the administrator or of a special master unappealed from or of a final order of a special master affirmed upon appeal, whereupon said court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same as though the judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 23; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

45-19-41.
Administrator to have exclusive jurisdiction over claims under article; final determination of claim bars further state actions.

The administrator shall have exclusive jurisdiction over any claim of any unlawful practice under this article. A final determination of a claim alleging an unlawful practice under this article shall exclude any other action or proceeding brought by the same person based on the same complaint, except for any remedies which may be available under the United States Constitution and federal laws.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 19; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

45-19-42.
Procurement of violation of article by person not subject thereto not a defense.

It shall not be a defense to a violation of this article by any person subject to this article that the violation was requested, sought, or otherwise procured by a person not subject to this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 22; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

45-19-43.
Access of administrator or designee to premises, records, and documents; persons required to make and keep employment records; application for relief from order due to hardship; unlawful to make information public.

In connection with an investigation of a complaint of an unlawful practice filed under this article, the administrator or the administrator’s designee shall have access at any reasonable time to premises, records, and documents relevant to the complaint and shall have the right to examine, photograph, and copy evidence.

Any person subject to this article shall:

Make and keep such records as may be prescribed by rules and regulations of the administrator which are necessary and relevant to the determination of whether an unlawful practice has been or is being committed; and

Make such reports therefrom as the administrator shall prescribe by rules and regulations which are reasonable, necessary, or appropriate for the enforcement of this article or orders or regulations under this article.

If a person fails to permit access, examination, photographing, or copying or fails to make or keep records or reports as required by this Code section, the administrator may issue an order requiring compliance. Upon a failure to comply with the order of the administrator, the administrator may apply to the superior court for an order directing compliance.

The administrator, by regulation, shall require each person subject to this article who controls an apprenticeship or other training program to keep all records reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this article, including, but not limited to, a list of applicants who wish to participate in such program, including the chronological order in which such applications were received. Such records shall be furnished to the administrator upon the administrator’s request. The administrator may also request and receive a detailed description of the manner in which persons are selected to participate in the apprenticeship or other training program.

Records and reports required by the administrator under this Code section shall conform as closely as practicable to similar records and reports required by federal law and to customary record-keeping practices.

An employer or other person who believes that the application to them of an order issued under this article would result in undue hardship may apply to the administrator for relief from the application of the order. If the administrator finds that the application of the regulation or order to the employer or person in question would impose an undue hardship, the administrator may grant appropriate relief.

With respect to a particular employer or person, it is unlawful without the employer’s or the person’s consent for the administrator or an employee of the administrator to make public information obtained by the administrator or the administrator’s employees pursuant to the administrator’s authority under this Code section, except such information as shall reasonably be necessary to the conduct of a proceeding under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 18; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1.

45-19-44.
Unlawful practices punishable by civil fine.

It shall be an unlawful practice for a person willfully to:

Make public with respect to a particular employer or person without the employer’s or person’s consent information obtained by the administrator or the administrator’s employees pursuant to their authority under Code Section 45-19-41, except as shall reasonably be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article;

Retaliate or discriminate in any manner against a person because the person has opposed a practice declared unlawful by this article or because the person has made a charge, filed a complaint, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in any investigation, proceeding, or hearing concerning an unlawful practice under this article;

Aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce a person to engage in any of the acts or practices declared unlawful by this article;

Obstruct or prevent a person from complying with this article or with any order issued under this article;

Resist, prevent, impede, or interfere with the administrator or any of his representatives, employees, or with a special master in the lawful performance of duty under this article; provided, however, that it shall not be a violation of this article for anyone to challenge or resist any action by the administrator or any of his employees or by a special master when there is a good faith belief that the administrator is, or his employees are, or the special master is acting unlawfully or acting in excess of statutory authority; or

Initiate frivolous and unwarranted charges of discrimination against a public employer.

A violation of this Code section shall not be deemed a crime; but any person who willfully violates this Code section may be punished by a civil fine not to exceed $1,000.00.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 24; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 45.

45-19-45.
Unlawful conspiracies.

It shall be an unlawful practice for a person or for two or more persons to conspire:

To retaliate or discriminate in any manner against a person because the person has opposed a practice declared unlawful by this article or because the person has made a charge, filed a complaint, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in any investigation, proceeding, or hearing concerning an unlawful practice under this article;

To aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce a person to engage in any of the acts or practices declared unlawful by this article;

To obstruct or prevent a person from complying with this article or any order issued under this article;

To resist, prevent, impede, or interfere with the administrator or any of his employees or a special master in the lawful performance of duty under this article; provided, however, that it shall not be a violation of this article for anyone to challenge or resist any action by the administrator or any of his employees or a special master when there is a good faith belief that the administrator or his employees or a special master is acting unlawfully or acting in excess of his statutory authority; or

To initiate willfully frivolous and unwarranted charges of discrimination against a public employer.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 859, § 20; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45.

45-19-46.
Overtime compensation.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Overtime hours” means hours worked by a public employee for which payment of time and one-half overtime compensation or time and one-half compensatory time is required pursuant to the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C.A. 207, et seq.

“Public employee” or “applicant” means a public employee or applicant for public employment who is, or if hired would be, entitled to payment of time and one-half overtime compensation or time and one-half compensatory time for overtime hours, pursuant to the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C.A. 207, et seq.

No public employer shall require that a public employee or applicant agree, as a term and condition of employment, to receive neither time and one-half overtime compensation nor time and one-half compensatory time for overtime hours.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit a public employer from providing time and one-half compensatory time in lieu of cash overtime payment, or from exercising any other optional payment plan or method authorized by the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C.A. 207, et seq., including, but not limited to, the fluctuating work week method of overtime payment.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-19-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 622, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly related to repeal date of an article relating to fair employment practices and was enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1253, § 2 and repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1097, § 1. See Ga. L. 1982, p. 1253, § 1, for similar provisions in effect prior to Code enactment.